Illinois, session 104th, SB1933.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 16-204 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/16-204)7    Sec. 16-204. Optional defined contribution benefit. As 8soon as practicable after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, the System shall 10offer a defined contribution benefit to active full-time or 11part-time contractual members of the System who are employed 12by an employer eligible to participate in the defined 13contribution benefit under applicable law. The defined 14contribution benefit shall be an optional benefit to any 15full-time or part-time contractual member who chooses to 16participate. The defined contribution benefit shall collect 17optional employee and optional employer contributions into an 18account and shall offer investment options to the participant. 19The benefit under this Section shall be operated in full 20compliance with any applicable State and federal laws, and the 21System shall utilize generally accepted practices in creating 22and maintaining the benefit for the best interest of the 23participants. In administering the defined contribution   SB1933- 2 -LRB104 10220 RPS 20294 b1benefit, the System shall require that the defined 2contribution benefit recordkeeper agree that, in performing 3services with respect to the defined contribution benefit, the 4recordkeeper: (i) will not use information received as a 5result of providing services with respect to the defined 6contribution benefit or the participants in the defined 7contribution benefit to solicit the participants in the 8defined contribution benefit for the purpose of cross-selling 9nonplan products and services, unless in response to a request 10by a participant in the defined contribution benefit; and (ii) 11will not promote, recommend, endorse, or solicit participants 12in the defined contribution benefit to purchase any financial 13products or services outside of the defined contribution 14benefit, except that links to parts of the recordkeeper's 15website that are generally available to the public, are about 16commercial products, and may be encountered by a participant 17in the regular course of navigating the recordkeeper's website 18will not constitute a violation of this item (ii). The System 19may use funds from the employee and employer contributions to 20defray any and all costs of creating and maintaining the 21benefit. In addition, the System may use funds provided under 22Section 16-158 of this Code to defray any and all costs of 23creating and maintaining the benefit and then shall reimburse 24those costs from funds received from the employee and employer 25contributions under this Section. All employers must comply 26with the reporting and administrative functions established by   SB1933- 3 -LRB104 10220 RPS 20294 b1the System and are required to implement the benefits 2established under this Section. The System shall produce an 3annual report on the participation in the benefit and shall 4make the report public.5    As soon as is practicable on or after January 1, 2022, the 6System shall automatically enroll any employee who first 7becomes an active full-time or part-time contractual member or 8participant in the System. A member automatically enrolled 9under this Section shall have 3% of his or her pre-tax gross 10compensation for each compensation period deferred into his or 11her deferred compensation account, unless the member otherwise 12instructs the System on forms approved by the System. A member 13may elect, in a manner provided for by the System, to not 14participate in the defined contribution benefit or to increase 15or reduce the amount of pre-tax gross compensation 16contributed, consistent with State or federal law. A member 17shall be automatically enrolled in the benefit beginning the 18first day of the pay period following the close of the notice 19period, or as soon as practicable, unless the employee elects 20otherwise within the notice period member's 30th day of 21employment. For the purposes of this Section, "notice period" 22means a reasonable period of time after the employee is 23provided with an automatic enrollment notice as required under 24Section 414(w) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 25amended. An active full-time or part-time contractual A member 26who has been automatically enrolled in the benefit may elect,   SB1933- 4 -LRB104 10220 RPS 20294 b1within 90 days following the member's initial contribution 2days of enrollment, to withdraw from the contribution benefit 3and receive a refund of amounts deferred, as adjusted for plus 4or minus any applicable earnings and fees. A member making 5such an election shall forfeit all employer matching 6contributions, if any, made with respect to the initial 7contribution and the forfeited amounts shall be used to defray 8plan expenses earnings, investment fees, and administrative 9fees. Any refunded amount shall be included in the member's 10gross income for the taxable year in which the refund is 11issued.12    On or after January 1, 2023, the System may elect to 13increase the automatic annual contributions under this 14Section. The increase in the rate of contribution, however, 15shall not exceed 2% of a member's pre-tax gross compensation 16per year, and at no time shall any total contribution exceed 17any contribution limits established by State or federal law.18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 19active members eligible to participate in the defined 20contribution benefit do not include employees of a department 21as defined in Section 14-103.04. 22(Source: P.A. 102-540, eff. 8-20-21; 103-552, eff. 8-11-23.)